Louisiana, session 2026, SB453.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:1051(F) and (G) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1051. Authority to create and alter the boundaries of districts
* * *
F. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsections A and B of this Section,
the governing authority of Lafourche Parish shall not abolish or alter the
boundaries of a hospital service district within the parish unless the abolition
or alteration is approved by two-thirds of the full membership of the board of
commissioners of the district and approved by a majority of the voters of the
district, at an election held for the purpose of authorizing such abolition or
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-270 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 453
alteration in accordance with the Louisiana Election Code. The parish
governing authority or the board of commissioners may call an election for such
purpose after the board of commissioners has voted for such approval as
provided in this Subsection.
G. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsections A and B of this Section,
the governing authority of Terrebonne Parish shall not abolish or alter the
boundaries of a hospital service district within the parish unless the abolition
or alteration is approved by two-thirds of the full membership of the board of
commissioners of the district and approved by a majority of the voters of the
district, voting at an election held for the purpose of authorizing such abolition
or alteration in accordance with the Louisiana Election Code. The parish
governing authority or the board of commissioners may call an election for such
purpose after the board of commissioners has voted for such approval as
provided in this Subsection.